Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska35-1405
Employee; duty to notify employer.

An employee acting as a volunteer emergency responder shall make a reasonable effort to notify his or her employer that he or she may be absent from or report late to his or her place of employment in order to respond to an emergency.

Laws 2008, LB1096, § 8.